Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB70.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 310 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
SECTION 1.
PURPOSE
The purpose of this compact is to facilitate interstate practice of dietetics with the goal
of improving public access to dietetics services. This compact preserves the regulatory
authority of states to protect public health and safety through the current system of
state licensure, while also providing for licensure portability through a compact
privilege granted to qualifying professionals. This compact is designed to achieve the
following objectives:
A. Increase public access to dietetics services;
B. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by licensed dietitians who meet
uniform requirements;
C. Eliminate the necessity for licenses in multiple states;
D. Reduce administrative burden on member states and licensees;
E. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
F. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating multistate practice of
licensed dietitians;
G. Support relocating active military members and their spouses;
H. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary information
among member states; and
I. Vest all member states with the authority to hold a licensed dietitian accountable
for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the
time care is rendered.
SECTION 2.
Page 1 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions
shall apply:
A. "ACEND" means the Accreditation Council for Education in Nutrition and
Dietetics or its successor organization;
B. "Active military member" means any individual with full-time duty status in the
active Armed Forces of the United States, including members of the National
Guard and Reserve;
C. "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action
permitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing authority or other
authority against a licensee, including actions against an individual’s license or
compact privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the
licensee, limitation on the licensee’s practice, or any other encumbrance on
licensure affecting a licensee’s authorization to practice, including issuance of a
cease and desist action;
D. "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or practice
remediation process approved by a licensing authority;
E. "CDR" means the Commission on Dietetic Registration or its successor
organization;
F. "Charter member state" means any member state which enacted this compact by
law before the effective date specified in Section 12 of this compact;
G. "Compact commission" means the government agency whose membership
consists of all states that have enacted this compact, which is known as the
Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission, as described in Section 8 of this
compact, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the member states;
H. "Compact privilege" means a legal authorization, which is equivalent to a
license, permitting the practice of dietetics in a remote state;
Page 2 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
I. "Continuing education" means a requirement, as a condition of license renewal,
to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of, educational and
professional activities relevant to practice or area of work;
J. "Current significant investigative information" means:
1. Investigative information that a licensing authority, after a preliminary
inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the subject licensee
to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless
and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the subject licensee represents
an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the
subject licensee has been notified and had an opportunity to respond;
K. "Data system" means a repository of information about licensees, including but
not limited to continuing education, examination, licensure, investigative,
compact privilege, and adverse action information;
L. "Encumbered license" means a license in which an adverse action restricts a
licensee’s ability to practice dietetics;
M. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, a
licensee’s full and unrestricted practice of dietetics by a licensing authority;
N. "Executive committee" means a group of delegates elected or appointed to act on
behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, this compact and the
compact commission;
O. "Home state" means the member state that is the licensee’s primary state of
residence or that has been designated pursuant to Section 6 of this compact;
P. "Investigative information" means information, records, and documents received
or generated by a licensing authority pursuant to an investigation;
Q. "Jurisprudence requirement" means an assessment of an individual’s knowledge
of the state laws and regulations governing the practice of dietetics in such state;
Page 3 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
R. "License" means an authorization from a member state to either:
1. Engage in the practice of dietetics, including medical nutrition therapy; or
2. Use the title "dietitian," "licensed dietitian," "licensed dietitian
nutritionist," "certified dietitian," or other title describing a substantially
similar practitioner as the compact commission may further define by rule;
S. "Licensee" or "licensed dietitian" means an individual who currently holds a
license and who meets all of the requirements outlined in Section 4 of this
compact;
T. "Licensing authority" means the board or agency of a state, or equivalent, that is
responsible for the licensing and regulation of the practice of dietetics;
U. "Member state" means a state that has enacted the compact;
V. "Practice of dietetics" means the synthesis and application of dietetics as defined
by state law and administrative regulations, primarily for the provision of
nutrition care services, including medical nutrition therapy, in person or via
telehealth, to prevent, manage, or treat diseases or medical conditions and
promote wellness;
W. "Registered dietitian" means a person who:
1. Has completed applicable education, experience, examination, and
recertification requirements approved by CDR;
2. Is credentialed by CDR as a registered dietitian or a registered dietitian
nutritionist; and
3. Is legally authorized to use the title registered dietitian or registered dietitian
nutritionist and the corresponding abbreviations "RD" or "RDN";
X. "Remote state" means a member state other than the home state, where a
licensee is exercising or seeking to exercise a compact privilege;
Y. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by the compact commission that has the
force of law;
Page 4 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
Z. "Single state license" means a license issued by a member state within the
issuing state and does not include a compact privilege in any other member state;
AA. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States
of America; and
AB. "Unencumbered license" means a license that authorizes a licensee to engage in
the full and unrestricted practice of dietetics.
SECTION 3.
STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To participate in the compact, a state must currently:
1. License and regulate the practice of dietetics; and
2. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints
about licensees.
B. A member state shall:
1. Participate fully in the compact commission’s data system, including using
the unique identifier as defined in the rules;
2. Notify the compact commission, in compliance with the terms of the
compact and rules, of any adverse action or the availability of current
significant investigative information regarding a licensee;
3. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history record
information of applicants for an initial compact privilege. These procedures
shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based
information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant’s
criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal
records.
a. A member state must fully implement a criminal history record
information requirement, within a time frame established by rule,
Page 5 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
which includes receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation record search and shall use those results in determining
compact privilege eligibility.
b. Communication between a member state and the compact commission
or among member states regarding the verification of eligibility for a
compact privilege shall not include any information received from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a federal criminal history
record information check performed by a member state;
4. Comply with and enforce the rules of the compact commission;
5. Require an applicant for a compact privilege to obtain or retain a license in
the licensee’s home state and meet the home state’s qualifications for
licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all other applicable state laws;
and
6. Recognize a compact privilege granted to a licensee who meets all of the
requirements outlined in Section 4 of this compact in accordance with the
terms of the compact and rules.
C. Member states may set and collect a fee for granting a compact privilege.
D. Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able to apply for a
member state’s single state license as provided under the laws of each member
state. However, the single state license granted to these individuals shall not be
recognized as granting a compact privilege to engage in the practice of dietetics
in any other member state.
E. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member
state for the issuance of a single state license.
F. At no point shall the compact commission have the power to define the
requirements for the issuance of a single state license to practice dietetics. The
member states shall retain sole jurisdiction over the provision of these
Page 6 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
requirements.
SECTION 4.
COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To exercise the compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the compact,
the licensee shall:
1. Satisfy one (1) of the following:
a. Hold a valid current registration that gives the applicant the right to
use the term registered dietitian; or
b. Complete all of the following:
i. An education program which is either:
(a) A master’s degree or doctoral degree that is
programmatically accredited by ACEND or by a dietetics
accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education, which the compact commission
may by rule determine, and from a college or university
accredited at the time of graduation by the appropriate
regional accrediting agency recognized by the Council on
Higher Education Accreditation and the United States
Department of Education; or
(b) An academic degree from a college or university in a
foreign country equivalent to the degree described in
subsection A.1.b.i. of this section that is programmatically
accredited by ACEND or by a dietetics accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education,
which the compact commission may by rule determine;
ii. A planned, documented, supervised practice experience in
dietetics that is programmatically accredited by ACEND or by a
Page 7 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
dietetics accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education which the compact commission may by
rule determine and which involves at least one thousand (1,000)
hours of practice experience under the supervision of a
registered dietitian or a licensed dietitian; and
iii. Successful completion of either the registration examination for
dietitians administered by CDR or a national credentialing
examination for dietitians approved by the compact commission
by rule, with such completion being no more than five (5) years
prior to the date of the licensee’s application for initial licensure
and accompanied by a period of continuous licensure thereafter,
all of which may be further governed by the Rules of the
compact commission.
2. Hold an unencumbered license in the home state;
3. Notify the compact commission that the licensee is seeking a compact
privilege within a remote state or states;
4. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact privilege;
5. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established by the remote state or
states in which the licensee is seeking a compact privilege; and
6. Report to the compact commission any adverse action, encumbrance, or
restriction on a license taken by any nonmember state within thirty (30)
days from the date the action is taken.
B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date of the home state license.
To maintain a compact privilege, renewal of the compact privilege shall be
congruent with the renewal of the home state license as the compact commission
may define by rule. The licensee must comply with the requirements of Section
4A. of this compact to maintain the compact privilege in the remote state or
Page 8 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
states.
C. A licensee exercising a compact privilege shall adhere to the laws and regulations
of the remote state. Licensees shall be responsible for educating themselves on,
and complying with, any and all state laws relating to the practice of dietetics in
such remote state.
D. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary provided in this compact or state law, a
licensee exercising a compact privilege shall not be required to complete
continuing education requirements required by a remote state. A licensee
exercising a compact privilege is only required to meet any continuing education
requirements as required by the home state.
SECTION 5.
OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE LICENSE BASED ON A COMPACT
PRIVILEGE
A. A licensee may hold a home state license, which allows for a compact privilege in
other member states, in only one (1) member state at a time.
B. If a licensee changes home state by moving between two (2) member states:
1. The licensee shall file an application for obtaining a new home state license
based on a compact privilege, pay all applicable fees, and notify the current
and new home state in accordance with the rules of the compact
commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new home state license by
virtue of a compact privilege, the new home state shall verify that the
licensee meets the criteria in Section 4 of this compact via the data system,
and require that the licensee complete the following:
a. Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based criminal history
record information check;
b. Any other criminal history record information required by the new
Page 9 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
home state; and
c. Any jurisprudence requirements of the new home state.
3. The former home state shall convert the former home state license into a
compact privilege once the new home state has activated the new home state
license in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the compact
commission.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this compact, if the licensee cannot
meet the criteria in Section 4 of this compact, the new home state may apply
its requirements for issuing a new single state license.
5. The licensee shall pay all applicable fees to the new home state in order to
be issued a new home state license.
C. If a license changes their state of residence by moving from a member state to a
nonmember state, or from a nonmember state to a member state, the state criteria
shall apply for issuance of a single state license in the new state.
D. Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a licensee’s ability to hold a single
state license in multiple states; however, for the purposes of this compact, a
licensee shall have only one (1) home state license.
E. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member
state for the issuance of a single state license.
SECTION 6.
ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
An active military member, or their spouse, shall designate a home state where the
individual has a current license in good standing. The individual may retain the home
state designation during the period the service member is on active duty.
SECTION 7.
ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have
Page 10 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
the authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to:
1. Take adverse action against a licensee’s compact privilege within that
member state; and
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence.
Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority in a member state for the
attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from
another member state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure applicable
to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before that court. The issuing
authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees
required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or
evidence are located.
B. Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a
licensee’s home state license.
C. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall give the same priority
and effect to reported conduct received from a member state as it would if the
conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall
apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action.
D. The home state shall complete any pending investigations of a licensee who
changes home states during the course of the investigations. The home state shall
also have authority to take appropriate action and shall promptly report the
conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of the data system. The
administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the new home state of any
adverse actions.
E. A member state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected
licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting from any
Page 11 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
adverse action taken against that licensee.
F. A member state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of another
remote state, provided that the member state follows its own procedures for taking
the adverse action.
G. Joint Investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective state
law, any member state may participate with other member states in joint
investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint investigation initiated under the
compact.
H. If adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee’s home state
resulting in an encumbrance on the home state license, the licensee’s compact
privilege in all other member states shall be revoked until all encumbrances have
been removed from the home state license. All home state disciplinary orders that
impose adverse action against a licensee shall include a statement that the
licensee’s compact privileges are revoked in all member states during the
pendency of the order.
I. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored to an unencumbered
license, as certified by the home state’s licensing authority, the licensee must meet
the requirements of Section 4A. of this compact and follow the administrative
requirements to reapply to obtain a compact privilege in any remote state.
J. If a member state takes adverse action, it shall promptly notify the administrator
of the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the
other member states state of any adverse actions.
K. Nothing in this compact shall override a member state’s decision that
participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action.
Page 12 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
SECTION 8.
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE DIETITIAN LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint government
agency whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted the
compact known as the Dietitian Licensure Compact Commission. The compact
commission is an instrumentality of the compact states acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one (1) state. The compact commission shall come into
existence on or after the effective date of the compact as set forth in Section 12 of
this compact.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings.
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected by
that member state’s licensing authority.
2. The delegate shall be the primary administrator of the licensing authority or
their designee.
3. The compact commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office
for delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The compact commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
5. A member state’s licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate
occurring on the compact commission within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all matters before the
compact commission requiring a vote by the delegates.
7. Delegates shall meet and vote by such means as set forth in the bylaws. The
bylaws may provide for delegates to meet and vote in-person or by
telecommunication, video conference, or other means of communication.
8. The compact commission shall meet at least once during each calendar
year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The
Page 13 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
compact commission may meet in person or by telecommunication, video
conference, or other means of communication.
C. The compact commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the compact commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Establish and amend rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
compact, the compact commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
compact commission, provided that the standing of any licensing authority
to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as
the authenticated business records of the compact commission, and
designate an agent to do so on the compact commission’s behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including but not
limited to employees of a member state;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
compact, and establish the compact commission’s personnel policies and
programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and
other related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate donations, grants of money, other sources of
revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, services, and gifts, and receive,
Page 14 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the compact
commission shall avoid any actual or appearance of impropriety or conflict
of interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in
this compact or the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
20. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a vice
chair;
21. Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different from
the model compact language such that the state would not qualify for
participation in the compact; and
22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this compact.
D. The Executive Committee.
1. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
compact commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers,
duties, and responsibilities of the executive committee shall include:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the compact
Page 15 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the
compact, its rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed
necessary;
b. Recommend to the compact commission changes to the rules or
bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to compact
member states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensure compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the compact commission;
f. Monitor compact compliance of member states and provide
compliance reports to the compact commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the compact commission during the
interim between compact commission meetings, except for adopting or
amending rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any
other powers and duties expressly reserved to the compact commission
by rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the compact
commission.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of nine (9) members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the compact commission shall be voting
members of the executive committee;
b. Five (5) voting members from the current membership of the compact
commission, elected by the compact commission;
c. One (1) ex officio, nonvoting member from a recognized professional
association representing dietitians; and
Page 16 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
d. One (1) ex officio, nonvoting member from a recognized national
credentialing organization for dietitians.
3. The compact commission may remove any member of the executive
committee as provided in the compact commission’s bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that
the executive committee may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as
provided in subsection F.2. of this section.
b. The executive committee shall give thirty (30) days’ notice of its
meetings, posted on the website of the compact commission and as
determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in the business
of the compact commission.
c. The executive committee may hold a special meeting in accordance
with subsection F.1.b. of this section.
E. The compact commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual
report.
F. Meetings of the Compact Commission.
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the compact
commission may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in
subsection F.2. of this section.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full compact commission shall
begiven in the same manner as required under the rulemaking
provisions in Section 10 of this compact, except that the compact
commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subsection
F.1.b. of this section.
b. The compact commission may hold a special meeting when it must
meet to conduct emergency business by giving twenty-four (24) hours’
Page 17 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
notice to all member states, on the compact commission’s website, and
other means as provided in the compact commission’s rules. The
compact commission’s legal counsel shall certify that the compact
commission’s need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
2. The compact commission or the executive committee or other committees of
the compact commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for
the compact commission or executive committee or other committees of the
compact commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the
compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters, practices,
or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the compact
commission or by a member state’s licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged
or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on
behalf of or for use of the compact commission or other committee
charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of
compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
Page 18 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member
state law; or
l. Other matters as specified in the rules of the compact commission.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall
state that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting
provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
4. The compact commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a
description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection
with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and
documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release
only by a majority vote of the compact commission or order of a court of
competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Compact Commission.
1. The compact commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The compact commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
sources as provided in subsection C.13. of this section.
3. The compact commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment
from each member state and impose fees on licensees of member states to
whom it grants a compact privilege to cover the cost of the operations and
activities of the compact commission and its staff, which must, in a total
amount, be sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for
which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual
assessment amount for member states shall be allocated based upon a
Page 19 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
formula that the compact commission shall promulgate by rule.
4. The compact commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the compact
commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and
with the authority of the member state.
5. The compact commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the compact commission
shall be subject to the financial review and accounting procedures
established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of
funds handled by the compact commission shall be subject to an annual
financial review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report
of the financial review shall be included in and become part of the annual
report of the compact commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification.
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of
the compact commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both
personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss
of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out
of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred, within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed
to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury,
or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the compact
commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted
hereunder.
Page 20 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
2. The compact commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the compact commission in any
civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of compact
commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the
compact commission that the person against whom the claim is made had a
reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of compact
commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own
counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s intentional
or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The compact commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the compact
commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against
that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred within the scope of compact commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission
did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be
governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
a member state’s state action immunity or state action affirmative defense
Page 21 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any
other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
immunity by the member states or by the compact commission.
SECTION 9.
DATA SYSTEM
A. The compact commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated data system.
B. The compact commission shall assign each applicant for a compact privilege a
unique identifier, as determined by the rules.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state
shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to whom this
compact is applicable as required by the rules of the compact commission,
including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege and information
related thereto;
4. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information
related to such participation not made confidential under member state law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial;
6. The presence of current significant investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the compact
commission.
D. The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this compact
Page 22 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
or through the data system, when certified by the compact commission or an
agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the compact
commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any
relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member state.
E. Current significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any
member state will only be available to other member states.
F. It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action against a
licensee and to monitor the data system to determine whether any adverse action
has been taken against a licensee. Adverse action information pertaining to a
licensee in any member state will be available to any other member state.
G. Member states contributing information to the data system may designate
information that may not be shared with the public without the express
permission of the contributing state.
H. Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing the
information shall be removed from the data system.
SECTION 10.
RULEMAKING
A. The compact commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively
and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the
compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of
competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the compact
commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the
scope and purposes of the compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based
upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The rules of the compact commission shall have the force of law in each member
state, provided however that where the rules conflict with the laws or regulations
Page 23 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
of a member state that relate to the procedures, actions, and processes a licensed
dietitian is permitted to undertake in that state and the circumstances under
which they may do so, as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of
the compact commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the
conflict.
C. The compact commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall
become binding on the day following adoption or as of the date specified in the
rule or amendment, whichever is later.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or portion of a
rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule
shall have no further force and effect in any member state.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the compact
commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the compact commission shall hold a public
hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts,
opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the compact commission, and at least
thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the compact commission will
hold a public hearing on the proposed rule, the compact commission shall
provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the compact commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the compact commission’s notices
of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other ways as the compact commission may by rule specify.
Page 24 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the compact
commission will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the compact
commission will consider and vote on the proposed rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
means of communication, the compact commission shall include the
mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefore;
4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person;
and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments
and documents received by the compact commission in response to the proposed
rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on
each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the compact commission
at hearings required by this section.
K. The compact commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action
on the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
1. The compact commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
2. The compact commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The compact commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the
rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection 10.L. of this
Page 25 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
section, the effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days
after issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the compact commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule with twenty-four (24) hours’ notice, with
opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided
in the compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon
as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective
date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that
must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of compact commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal
law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The compact commission or an authorized committee of the compact commission
may direct revision to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical
errors. Public notice of any revision shall be posted on the website of the compact
commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period
of thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds
that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made
in writing and delivered to the compact commission prior to the end of the notice
period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further
action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the compact commission.
N. No member state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this compact.
SECTION 11.
Page 26 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight.
1. The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member
state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement this compact.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this compact, venue is proper and judicial
proceedings by or against the compact commission shall be brought solely
and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal
office of the compact commission is located. The compact commission may
waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein
shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against
a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar
matter.
3. The compact commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact
and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes.
Failure to provide the compact commission service of process shall render a
judgment or order void as to the compact commission, this compact, or
promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination.
1. If the compact commission determines that a member state has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or
the promulgated rules, the compact commission shall provide written notice
to the defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the
proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
compact commission may take and shall offer training and specific
Page 27 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The compact commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the
other member states.
C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be
terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred
on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of
termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend
or terminate shall be given by the compact commission to the Governor, the
majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, the defaulting
state’s licensing authority, and each of the member states’ licensing authority.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations,
and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such termination.
The terminated state shall continue to recognize all compact privileges granted
pursuant to this compact for a minimum of six (6) months after the date of said
notice of termination.
G. The compact commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found
to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed
upon in writing between the compact commission and the defaulting state.
H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the compact commission by
petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the
Page 28 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
federal district where the compact commission has its principal offices. The
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution.
1. Upon request by a member state, the compact commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and
between member and nonmember states.
2. The compact commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement.
1. By supermajority vote, the compact commission may initiate legal action
against a member state in default in the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the compact commission
has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall not be the
exclusive remedies of the compact commission. The compact commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting
member state’s law.
2. A member state may initiate legal action against the compact commission in
the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the compact commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules.
The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
Page 29 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No party other than a member state shall enforce this compact against the
compact commission.
SECTION 12.
EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of the compact, the compact commission shall
convene and review the enactment of each of the first seven (7) member
states ("charter member states") to determine if the statute enacted by each
such charter member state is materially different than the model compact
statute.
a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Section 11 of this compact.
b. If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated, or
withdraws from the compact, the compact commission shall remain in
existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
member states should be less than seven (7).
2. Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the seven (7) initial
charter member states shall be subject to the process set forth in Section
8.C.21. of this compact to determine if their enactments are materially
different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for
participation in the compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the compact commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the compact prior to
the effective date of the compact or the compact commission coming into
Page 30 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
existence shall be considered to be actions of the compact commission
unless specifically repudiated by the compact commission.
4. Any state that joins the compact subsequent to the compact commission’s
initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and
bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that
state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the compact commission
shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes
law in that state.
B. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute
repealing the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty
(180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
state’s licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse
action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of
withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state
shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within
that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the
contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all compact
privileges granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of one hundred
eighty (180) days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state
and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.
D. This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this
compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is
Page 31 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
enacted into the laws of all member states.
SECTION 13.
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This compact and the compact commission’s rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the implementation and
administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or
requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to limit the compact
commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence, or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction
to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state seeking
participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof
to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional
by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact
and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding Section 13.B. of this compact, the compact commission may
deny a state’s participation in the compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of Section 11.B. of this compact, terminate a member state’s
participation in the compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement of
a member state is a material departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this
compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, the
compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states
and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable
matters.
SECTION 14.
CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
Page 32 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 142
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a
member state that is not inconsistent with the compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in
conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the compact commission and the member
states are binding in accordance with their terms.
Page 33 of 33
BR014200.100 - 142 - XXXX 3/7/2025 10:59 AM Jacketed